Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 697.692 is amended to read:
697.692. (1) Subject to subsection (4) of this  section,  a debt management service provider may
charge a consumer only the following fees:
(a) An initial fee of not more than $50.
(b) A fee reasonably calculated to recover the costs that the debt  management service provider
incurs in providing an initial counseling session or education class. The debt  management service
provider may charge the fee described in this paragraph in  advance, but the fee may not exceed $50.
(c) A monthly  fee equivalent to 15 percent of the funds that the debt management service pro-
vider receives from a consumer for payment to the consumer’s creditors.  The debt management
service provider may charge  the fee described in this paragraph only if the debt management service
provider holds a consumer’s  funds, directly or indirectly, on the consumer’s behalf. The fee described
in this paragraph may not exceed $65 per month.
(d) A fee equivalent to 15 percent of  the amount of debt a consumer owes to one or more
creditors at the time the consumer signs the agreement described in  ORS 697.652 and places funds
in a bank account that the consumer establishes or maintains in the consumer’s own name with  an
insured institution,  as defined in ORS 706.008, and designates specifically for making disbursements
in connection with a debt  management service. The debt management service provider may charge
the fee described in this paragraph only if the debt management service provider does not  hold a
consumer’s funds directly or indirectly.  The debt management service provider may not charge the
fee described in this paragraph in amounts or installments that exceed $65 per month.
(e) A fee equivalent to 7.5 percent of the difference between the principal  amount of the debt
the consumer owed to the consumer’s creditor at  the time the consumer signed the agreement de-
scribed in ORS 697.652 and the amount the  consumer paid to the creditor to settle the debt, exclu-
sive of fees the consumer paid to the debt management service provider under paragraph (a), (b)  or
(d) of this subsection. The debt management service provider may charge the  fee described in this
paragraph only if the debt management  service provider obtains from the consumer’s creditor a re-
duction in the principal amount of the consumer’s debt.
(f) A fee of not more than  $50 per month during the term of an agreement between the
consumer and the debt management service provider  under which the debt management
service provider improves or  preserves, or offers to improve or preserve, a consumer’s credit
record, credit history or credit rating but does not conduct  a budget analysis for the con-
sumer, act as a broker for another debt  management service provider or otherwise engage
Enrolled Senate Bill 722 (SB 722-B) Page 1
in any other activity  that constitutes a debt management service. A fee that a debt man-
agement service provider  charges under paragraph (a) of this subsection is the fee for the
first month of service under this paragraph.
(2) A debt management  service provider may accept payment for a fee described in subsection
(1) of this section by means of:
(a) A check, draft or similar paper instrument; or
(b) A transfer of funds through an  electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, computer or
magnetic tape that transmits an order, instruction or authorization  to a financial institution to debit
or credit an account.
(3)(a) A consumer may void a contract for  debt management services, and a debt man-
agement service provider shall return to the consumer  all sums the consumer paid to the
debt management service provider and  reimburse the consumer for reasonable attorney fees
the consumer incurred in any action to enforce rights the consumer has under this sub-
section, if the debt management service provider charges the consumer more  than the
amounts set forth in this section.
(b) A consumer may not waive any of the rights the  consumer has under this subsection,
and any provision in any contract or other agreement that purports  to waive the consumer’s
rights is void.
(4) The director by rule may adjust  the fees set forth in this section to reflect changes
in the U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers  (All Items) as
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States  Department of Labor. In
adjusting fees, the director may consider whether  changes in fees that other states charge
for similar services warrant a change in fees in this state.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 697.692 by section 1 of this 2017  Act apply to debt
management services for which a consumer enters  into a contract or other agreement on
or after the operative date specified in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments  to ORS 697.692 by section 1 of this 2017 Act become
operative on January 1, 2018.
(2) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services may  adopt rules
and take  any other action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section
that is necessary to enable the director, on  and after the operative date specified in sub-
section (1) of this section, to exercise all of the duties, functions  and powers conferred on
the director by the amendments to ORS 697.692 by section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 722 (SB 722-B) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 18, 2017
Repassed by Senate June 12, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 722 (SB 722-B) Page 3